California statutes. Financial Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.6.

The amount of a claim of an investment certificate holder shall be the amount which the investment certificate holder would have been entitled to withdraw as of the date of taking possession, pursuant to Section 18415, plus interest thereon accrued to that date, without regard to whether the account is subject to any pledge. In the case of an account with a fixed or minimum term or a qualifying or notice period that has not expired as of the date of taking possession, interest shall be computed as if the account had been withdrawn on that date without penalty or reduction in interest.

The liquidator shall give notice to each investment certificate holder of the amount of his or her claim and the investment certificate holder shall not be required to file a claim unless he or she disputes the amount of the liquidator’s determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.7.

When the time fixed for the presentation of claims has expired, the liquidator shall make in duplicate a full and complete list of all claims presented, including and specifying those claims that have been rejected by the liquidator, and a list of all claims of investment certificate holders as shown by the books or records of the company, and shall file one copy of the list in the commissioner’s office and one with the clerk of the superior court in which the liquidation proceedings are being held. Before each application to the court for leave to declare a dividend, the liquidator shall file a supplemental list of claims
 presented since the last preceding list was filed, including and specifying the claims as have been rejected by the liquidator. The list of claims and of claims of investment certificate holders as shown by the books or records of the company shall be open for inspection at all reasonable times.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.8.

Objections to any claim not rejected by the liquidator may be made by any person interested by filing his or her objections, in writing, with the liquidator, who shall present the objections to the court. The court shall dispose of the objections or may order reference for that purpose, and should the objections to any claim be sustained by the court or by the referee, that claim shall not be allowed by the liquidator until the claimant has established his or her claim by judgment. Any objections to a claim shall be filed within 60 days from the date of filing of the schedule of claims as required by this article with the
 court or be forever barred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.9.

The liquidator, with the approval of the court, may pay one or more dividends to investment certificate holders prior to the expiration of the time for filing claims. After the time for filing of claims has elapsed, the liquidator, after obtaining approval of the court, may pay one or more dividends upon all approved claims out of the funds remaining in the liquidator’s possession after the payment of expenses and after setting aside an amount to pay creditors whose claims have been rejected and whose time for filing an application to show cause under this article has not yet elapsed or whose application is still pending. At
 any time after the expiration of one year from the date of the first publication of notice of creditors, and with court approval, the liquidator may pay a final distribution which shall consist of the remaining funds available for distribution, being distributed pro rata to all approved creditor claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.10.

(a) Claims allowed in a proceeding under this article shall be given preference in the following order:

(1) All costs and expenses of administration of conservatorship and liquidation.

(2) Taxes due to the State of California.

(3) Claims having preference by the laws of the United States and by laws of this state.

(4) All claims of creditors,
 including contractual claims for interest to the date of payment, whose claims are fully secured.

(5) Claims of investment certificate holders.

(6) Claims of general creditors.

(7) Claims on obligations subordinated to the claims of investment certificate holders and general creditors.

Paragraphs (5) and (6) apply only in liquidation proceedings, where the commissioner has taken possession of the property and business of the company on or after the effective date of this section, and paragraph (6) shall apply only with respect to persons who become general creditors on or after that date. It is the intent of the Legislature that no change in the law contained in this section shall be construed to affect the rights and obligations of parties with regard to transactions
 occurring prior to the effective date of this section. It is the intent of the Legislature that the rights and obligations of parties existing prior to the effective date of this section shall be determined by the law in effect prior to the effective date of this section and without application of changes in the law effected by this section.

(b) All approved claims shall bear interest at the rate provided by law or judgments from the date that the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of the company, to the extent funds are available to pay such interest, otherwise interest shall be prorated.

Interest shall be given the same preference as the claim on which it is based, but no interest on any claim shall be paid until all claims within the same class have received the full principal amount of the claim.

(c) Any funds
 remaining shall be returned to the stockholders of the company pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.11.

Whenever the commissioner determines to liquidate a company, the commissioner shall cause an inventory of all the assets of the company to be made in duplicate, file the original with the court, and file the duplicate in the commissioner’s office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.12.

If it appears improbable that anything can be realized from any property of the company and that the cost of maintaining, preserving, or protecting the property would probably be lost, the court may direct the liquidator to abandon the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.13.

If a purchaser of any property or any bad or doubtful debt or claim of a company cannot be obtained and it appears improbable that recovery thereon can be had, and that the cost of action to enforce collection of the same would probably be lost, the superior court may direct that suit on the debt or claim need not be brought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.14.

When the liquidator has fully liquidated all claims other than claims of stockholders, made due provision for any and all known but unclaimed liabilities, excepting claims of stockholders, and paid all expenses of liquidation, the liquidator may file an application for an order for the liquidation of a domestic corporation, or at any time thereafter, the commissioner may apply for, and the court shall make, an order dissolving the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.15.

Upon the payment of a final dividend in liquidation, the commissioner shall prepare and file with the court a full and final statement of the liquidation, including a summary of the receipts and disbursements, and a duplicate of the statement shall be filed in the office of the commissioner. After hearing and approval by the court, the liquidation shall be closed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.16.

In making its order approving the commissioner’s final statement of the liquidation of the company, the court shall determine the amounts of the liquidating dividends to which claimants are entitled but which then remain unpaid or unclaimed in the hands of the commissioner. The order of the court shall direct the commissioner to deposit those amounts with the Treasurer. All amounts so deposited shall be deemed to be deposited in the State Treasury under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and shall be subject to claim or disposition as provided in
 that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.17.

The order of the court approving the final statement on liquidation shall provide for the destruction or other disposition of the books and records of the company or pertaining to the liquidation of the company, and the court may declare the company dissolved as a corporation. The liquidator shall file a copy of the order of dissolution with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Securities Transactions [18427. - 18427.11.]

18427.

Unless the context otherwise requires, in this article:

(a) “Offer” or “offer to sell” includes every attempt or offer to dispose of, or solicitation of an offer to buy, a security for value.

(b) “Sale” or “sell” includes every contract of sale of, contract to sell, or disposition of, a security for value. “Sale” or “sell” includes any exchange of securities and any change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or
 on outstanding securities.

(c) “Security” means any stock or debenture, or any warrant, right, or option to subscribe to or purchase any of the foregoing.

(d) The terms defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section do not include any stock dividend payable with respect to common stock of an industrial loan company solely (except for any cash or script paid for fractional shares) in shares of such common stock, if such industrial loan company has no other class of voting stock outstanding; provided, that shares issued in any such dividend shall be subject to any conditions previously imposed by the commissioner applicable to the shares with respect to which they are issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 598.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.1.

No industrial loan company organized under the laws of this state shall offer or sell any security issued by it unless the commissioner has issued a permit authorizing such sale.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 600.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.2.

An application for a permit shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner may prescribe.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 602.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.3.

The commissioner shall charge and collect fees for applications filed under this article as fixed in this section.

(a) The fee for a negotiating permit shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(b) The fee for a permit to exchange a security or to make any change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(c) The fee for any permit to sell securities other than as specified in subdivision (b) shall be one hundred dollars ($100) plus one-tenth of one percent of the aggregate value of the securities sought to be sold, up to a maximum aggregate fee of one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 604.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.4.

If the commissioner finds that the proposed sale of securities is fair, just, and equitable, he or she shall issue to the applicant a permit authorizing it to offer and sell the securities in such amount and upon such terms and conditions as he or she may provide in the permit. If the commissioner finds otherwise, he or she shall deny the application.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 606.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.5.

The commissioner may impose conditions in any permit issued under Section 18427.4, requiring the deposit in escrow of securities, imposing a legend condition restricting the transferability thereof, impounding the proceeds from the sale thereof, limiting the expense in connection with the sale thereof, or such other conditions as he or she deems reasonable and necessary or advisable in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 607.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.6.

Every permit issued pursuant to Section 18427.4 shall recite that it is permissive only and does not constitute a recommendation or endorsement of the securities permitted to be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 608.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.7.

The commissioner may amend, alter, suspend, or revoke any permit issued pursuant to Section 18427.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 609.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.8.

Whenever an industrial loan company applies for a permit to issue any security or to deliver any other consideration (whether or not such security or such transaction is exempt from, or not subject to, the provisions of Section 18427.1) in exchange for one or more bona fide outstanding securities (as defined in Section 25019 of the Corporations Code), claims, or property interests, or partly in such exchange and partly for cash, the commissioner is authorized to approve the terms and conditions of such issuance and exchange or such delivery and exchange and
 the fairness of such terms and conditions and is authorized to hold a hearing on the fairness of such terms and conditions, at which all persons to whom it is proposed to issue any security or to deliver any other consideration in such exchange shall have the right to appear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 610.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.9.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of Section 18427.1 all of the following:

(a) (1) Any offer, not involving a public offering, to an affiliate or to a person of the type described in subdivision (i) of Section 25102 of the Corporations Code or in the regulations of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation adopted thereunder.

(2) The execution and delivery of an agreement for the sale of securities to any person of the type described in paragraph (1), subject to all of the following:

(A) The agreement shall contain substantially the following provision:
“The sale of the securities which are the subject of
 this agreement has not been authorized by a permit issued by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation. The issuance of the securities or the payment or receipt of any part of the consideration therefor prior to the issuance of a permit is unlawful, unless the sale of securities is exempt from Section 18427.1 of the California Financial Code. The rights of all parties to this agreement are expressly conditioned upon the issuance of a permit, unless the sale is so exempt.”

(B) No part of the purchase price may be paid or received, and none of the securities may be issued, until a permit authorizing the sale of the securities is issued, unless the sale is exempt from Section 18427.1.

(b) Any transaction or security that the commissioner by regulation or order exempts as not being comprehended within the purposes of this article and the regulation of which they
 find is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 130.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.10.

Nothing contained in this article shall affect the Corporate Securities Law of 1968, Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 612.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18427.11.

The commissioner may by regulation or order restrict, limit, prohibit or otherwise condition the uses of the proceeds from the sale of securities, the extent to which a security may be included within the definition of capital, or the extent to which the proceeds from the sale of securities may be included in the investment certificate ratio as defined by Section 18016, or used to increase outstanding investment certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 613.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Prohibited Practices and Penalties [18435. - 18457.]

18435.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, any person who willfully violates any provision of this division, or who willfully violates any rule or order adopted pursuant to this division, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the
 Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment. However, no person may be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order unless he or she had knowledge of the rule or order. Conviction under this section shall not preclude the commissioner from exercising the authority provided in Section 18349.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 111.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18436.

An industrial loan company shall not, directly or indirectly, make any loan of money or property to or guarantee the obligation of any of its directors or officers, or officers and directors of its holding company, or officers and directors of its affiliates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

18437.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an industrial loan company shall not make loans to, or purchase any obligations from, persons who do not reside or have a place of business in the State of California, unless those loans or obligations comply with all of the following conditions:

(1) If the loan or obligation is unsecured, then only if the loan or obligation bears the unqualified written guaranty of a financially responsible person, considering the amount of the
 obligation, who resides or has a place of business in the State of California.

(2) If the documents and security for the loan or obligation and all records relating to the transaction are in California at the time the loan or obligation is made or acquired and are thereafter kept in California while the loan or obligation remains unsatisfied, except that where the security is aircraft, the security need not be in California at the time the loan or obligation is made or acquired, nor need it thereafter be held in California while the loan or obligation remains unsatisfied.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an industrial loan company may make loans to, or purchase any obligations from, persons who do not reside or have a place of business in the State of California not to exceed 25 percent, in the aggregate, of an industrial loan company’s total assets. Upon application to and
 approval by the commissioner, an industrial loan company may increase its loans to, or purchases of obligations from, persons who do not reside or have a place of business in this state not to exceed 50 percent, in the aggregate, of an industrial loan company’s total assets. The application shall include all of the following information:

(1) A description of the company’s proposed plan of business.

(2) The character, business qualifications, and other experience of the proposed officers and managers directing the line of business for which authorization is requested.

(3) Any other facts and circumstances bearing on the proposal that, as determined by the commissioner, may be relevant.

(c) This section does not apply to loans made to, or acquired from,
 persons who do not reside or have a place of business in this state if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The loans are for the purchase or refinance of single- or multi-family residential property or nonresidential property.

(2) The loans are salable in the secondary market as evidenced by commitments to buy by a buyer in the secondary market.

(3) The loans are owned by the industrial loan company for 90 days or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 345, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

18438.

If a loan is made or other thing is purchased or discounted in violation of Section 18271, 18272, 18273, 18274, or 18437, the officers, directors and shareholders of the industrial loan company, its holding company, or its affiliates participating therein or knowingly approving the same shall be personally liable for any loss suffered by the industrial loan company by reason thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

18439.

If any amount in excess of the charges permitted by this division, including interest, is charged, contracted for, or received in the making or collection of a contract of loan, except as a result of an accidental and bona fide error in computation, such contract is void and no person has any right to collect or receive the principal, interest, or charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18440.

An industrial loan company shall not take any confession of judgment or any power of attorney at the time of making the loan except a power of attorney taken to effectuate the transfer of the ownership of any motor vehicle, the transfer of the ownership of securities, or the cancellation of an insurance policy and the receipt and distribution of any unearned premiums in the event of default in the payment of a loan made to finance the purchase of any such insurance policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18441.

No person in connection with or incidental to the making of any loan under this division, shall require the borrower to contract for, purchase, or agree to purchase anything in connection with the loan. A policy of insurance of the type specified in Article 6 (commencing with Section 18290) of Chapter 3 of this division is not prohibited by this section.

No person shall require a borrower to enter into any collateral sales agreement or contract except as expressly permitted by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18442.

An industrial loan company shall not make any loan of money or property to or guarantee the obligation of any person upon the security of its capital (including the shares of capital stock) of the company, its holding company, or its affiliates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 18.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18443.

If any loan or guaranty is made in violation of Section 18436 or 18442, the directors and officers who authorize it or assent thereto are jointly and severally liable to the company as guarantors for the repayment or return of the sum or value so loaned with interest thereon at the rate of 6 percent per year until paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18444.

Any officer or director held liable under Section 18443, who satisfies such liability is entitled to contribution from any other officer or director who participates in authorizing, making or allowing any such loan or guaranty, and is subrogated to all rights of the corporation against the borrower or principal obligor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18445.

Any director, officer, or employee of an industrial loan company, its holding company, or its affiliates who asks for or receives, or consents or agrees to receive any commission, emolument, or gratuity or any money, property, or thing of value for procuring or endeavoring to procure for any person any loan from such company, or the purchase or discount of any note, contract, or other obligation or property by such company, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

18446.

Any director, officer, or employee of an industrial loan company, its holding company, or its affiliates who knowingly receives or possesses himself of any of its property otherwise than in payment of a just demand, or with intent to defraud, omits to make or causes to be made a full and true entry thereof in its books and accounts or concurs in omitting to make any material entry thereof, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

18447.

Any director, officer, or employee of an industrial loan company, its holding company, or its affiliates who knowingly makes or concurs in making or publishing any false entry in its books or records, any written report, exhibit, or statement of its affairs or pecuniary condition containing any material statement which is false, or having the custody of its books, willfully refuses or neglects to make any proper entry in such books as required by law, or to exhibit or allow the same to be inspected or extracts to be taken therefrom by the commissioner or his deputies or investigators, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

18448.

No director, officer, stockholder, or employee of an industrial loan company, its holding company, or its affiliates shall purchase, directly or indirectly, or be interested in the purchase of, any of the company’s assets for an amount less than the then current market value thereof and any such purchase may not be made without the express approval of the board of directors of the company. Title and possession of assets shall not be transferred to the purchaser until full consideration in cash has been received by the industrial loan company. Every person violating this section shall be liable to the company for twice the market value of the assets so
 purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

18449.

Every director of an industrial loan company who:
(a) In the case of the fraudulent insolvency of such company, shall have participated in such fraud; or(b) Willfully does any act as such director which is expressly forbidden by law or willfully omits to perform any duty imposed upon him as such director by law,
is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The insolvency of a company is deemed fraudulent for the purposes of this section, unless its affairs appear upon investigation to have been administered clearly, legally, and with the same care and diligence that agents receiving a compensation for their services are bound by law, to observe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18450.

A director, officer, or employee of an industrial loan company, its holding company, or its affiliates who concurs in any vote or act by which it is intended to make a loan or purchase a contract in violation of this division, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

18451.

A director, officer, or employee of an industrial loan company, its holding company, or its affiliates who makes or maintains, or attempts to make or maintain, a deposit of such company’s funds with any other person on condition, or with the understanding, express or implied, that the person receiving such deposit make a loan or advance, directly or indirectly, to any director, officer, or employee of the company so making or maintaining or attempting to make or maintain such deposit, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

18452.

Every officer or employee of an industrial loan company, its holding company, or its affiliates who sells investment or thrift certificates knowing that the company is insolvent, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

18453.

Any person who knowingly sells investment certificates in violation of any provision of this division or any order or regulation of the commissioner, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18454.

Any director, officer, agent or employee of an industrial loan company, its holding company, or its affiliates who willfully makes a false or untrue entry in any book or record or in any report, tag, or statement of the business, affairs, or condition, or in connection with any transaction of such company, with intent to deceive any officer, director, or employee thereof, or any agent or examiner, private or official, employed or lawfully appointed to examine into its condition or any of its affairs or transactions, or to any public officer who has authority to examine into its affairs or transactions, or who, with like intent, willfully omits to make a
 new entry of any matter particularly pertaining to the business property condition, affairs, transactions, assets or accounts of such company in any book, record, report, statement, or tag of such company, or who, with like intent, alters, abstracts, conceals, or destroys any book, record, report, statement, or tag of such company made, written, or kept, or required to be made, written, or kept by him or under his direction, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

18454.5.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully make any untrue statement of a material fact in any document filed with the commissioner under this division, or to willfully omit to state in any document any material fact which is required to be stated therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18455.

An industrial loan company shall not, directly or indirectly, make any loan to, or purchase a contract, loan, or chose in action from, hold a lease obligation of, or purchase a lease contract from, any of the following:

(a) A person who is an officer or director of the industrial loan company or of its holding or affiliated company.

(b) A person who is a holder of record or beneficiary of the shares of the industrial loan company or of
 any holding or affiliated company. This restriction shall not apply to persons holding less than 10 percent of the shares of a holding company or affiliated company that is exempt from the qualification requirements of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 contained in Section 25130 of the Corporations Code, pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 25101 of the Corporations Code.

(c) A person in which an officer or director of the industrial loan company or of any holding or affiliated company directly or indirectly is financially interested, directly or indirectly.

(d) A person in which the holder of record or beneficiary of the shares of the industrial loan company or of any holding or affiliated company directly or indirectly is financially interested, directly or indirectly. This restriction shall not apply to persons holding less than 10 percent of the shares of a holding
 company or affiliated company that is exempt from the qualification requirements of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 contained in Section 25130 of the Corporations Code, pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 25101 of the Corporations Code.

(e) A person who acquired those contracts directly or indirectly or through intervening assignments from a person described in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d).

Any officer, director, or shareholder of an industrial loan company who directly or indirectly makes or procures, or participates in making or procuring, a loan or contract in violation of this section or knowingly approves the same is personally liable for any loss resulting to an industrial loan company from the loan or contract, in addition to any other penalties provided by law.

(f) The prohibition contained in this section
 shall not apply to the purchase by an industrial loan company of a contract, loan, or chose in action from a finance lender, as described in Section 22009, a mortgage broker, a mortgage banker, a real estate broker or other licensed lender, provided written authorization for the purchase is obtained from the commissioner.

(g) The prohibition contained in this section shall not apply to the purchase of life insurance by an industrial loan company on behalf of an officer or director as part of the officer’s or director’s employee benefit plan package.

(h) The prohibition contained in this section shall not apply to the following transactions:

(1) A transaction between an industrial loan company and a subsidiary corporation or other entity in which the industrial loan company is the owner of 50 percent or more of the
 common stock or equity interest, or directly controls the management of the corporation or other entity.

(2) The purchase of loans or other obligations by an industrial loan company from an affiliated company pursuant to a sale and repurchase agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 201, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18456.

The provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to lease obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 911.)
-------------------------------------------

18457.

Any officer, director, employee, or agent of any company who abstracts or willfully misapplies any of the money, funds, or property of the industrial loan company, or willfully misapplies its credit, is guilty of a felony. Upon conviction, the court shall, in addition to any other punishment imposed, order the person to make full restitution to the industrial loan company. Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to repeal, amend, or impair any existing provision of law prescribing a punishment for such an offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 947, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Guarantee of Thrift Accounts [18475. - 18538.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [18475. - 18481.]

18475.

“Guaranty corporation” means Thrift Guaranty Corporation of California which exists under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------

18476.

(a) “Member” means an industrial loan company required by Section 18100.5 to be a member of Guaranty Corporation. “Member” includes “special member” except where the term “special member” is used in the same section of this chapter.

(b) “Special member” means a member whose thrift obligations are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation or, subject to any rules promulgated by the commissioner, by a private insurer, surety or guarantee corporation acceptable to and approved
 by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 8.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18477.

“Thrift obligations” as used in this chapter include principal invested in investment or thrift certificates however evidenced, and unpaid interest thereon accrued as of the last interest accrual date prior to the date the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a member or the date such member is the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy, whichever occurs sooner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 41.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

18478.

“Fund” means the Guaranty Corporation Fund established pursuant to Section 18535.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 9.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18479.

“Capital contribution” means the amount each member is required to maintain as an investment in the corporation pursuant to Section 18535.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 10.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18480.

“Member account” means the total of all amounts credited to a member for paid-in capital contributions, and other credits, net of any charges to that participating member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 11.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18481.

“Guaranteed investment certificate” means a thrift obligation guaranteed by Guaranty Corporation pursuant to Section 18523.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 12.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General [18490. - 18512.]

18490.

When the property and business of a member, other than a special member, has been liquidated or is in the process of liquidation by the commissioner and the proceeds of liquidation distributed ratably are insufficient to pay up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of each thrift obligation specified in Section 18523, the commissioner shall direct Guaranty Corporation to pay and Guaranty Corporation shall pay each such deficiency at the direction of and in amounts as directed by the commissioner within 10 days from the date the commissioner makes demand for payment. If the total funds available from Guaranty Corporation at that